Utah statutes.
76-10-1224.   Defense to prosecution for distribution or exhibition of pornographic film -- Status as projectionist or other employee no defense.

(1)  It shall be an affirmative defense to any prosecution under Section 76-10-1222 or 76-10-1223 that the distribution is exempt from the restrictions of this act by the provisions of Section 76-10-1226.

(2)  It shall not constitute a defense to any prosecution under Section 76-10-1222 or 76-10-1223 that the actor was a motion picture projectionist or was otherwise required by his employment to commit the violation complained of.



Enacted by Chapter 93, 1977 General Session

